Utah statutes.
31A-2-402.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Commission" means the Title and Escrow Commission created in Section 31A-2-403.

(2)  "Concurrence" means the entities given a concurring role must jointly agree for the action to be taken.

(3)  "Dual licensed title licensee" means a title licensee who holds:

(a)  a producer license as a title licensee; and

(b)  a license or certificate under:

(i)  Title 61, Chapter 2c, Utah Residential Mortgage Practices and Licensing Act;

(ii)  Title 61, Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act; or

(iii)  Title 61, Chapter 2g, Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Act.

(4)  "Real Estate Commission" means the Real Estate Commission created in Section 61-2f-103.

(5)  "Title licensee" means a person licensed under this title as:

(a)  an agency with a title insurance line of authority;

(b)  a producer with:

(i)  a general title insurance line of authority; or

(ii)  a specific category of authority for title insurance; or

(c)  a title insurance adjuster.



Amended by Chapter 289, 2011 General Session

